Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201645-910
License; posting; renewal; fee.

(1) A license issued pursuant to the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing
Act shall be conspicuously posted at the licensee's place of business.

(2) All licenses shall remain in effect until the next succeeding May
1, unless earlier canceled, suspended, or revoked by the director pursuant
to section 45-922 or surrendered by the licensee pursuant to section 45-911.

(3) Licenses may be renewed annually by filing with the director (a)
a renewal fee consisting of five hundred dollars for the main office location and five hundred dollars for each branch office
location and (b) an application for renewal containing such information as
the director may require to indicate any material change in the information
contained in the original application or succeeding renewal applications.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 105;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 56;

Laws 2012, LB269, § 2.